Maryland, session 2026, SB0864.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
15–106.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) (i) “Foster care recipient” means an individual who:
1. Was placed in an out–of–home placement by the
Department of Human Services; and
2. A. Resided in an out–of–home placement on the
individual’s 18th birthday or at the time the individual graduated from high school or
successfully completed a GED; or
B. Resided in an out–of–home placement on or after the
individual’s [13th] 8TH birthday for at least 1 year and was placed into guardianship,
adopted, or reunited with at least one of the individual’s parents.
– 1 –

Ch. 785 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) “Foster care recipient” includes a younger sibling of an individual
described in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph if the younger sibling is concurrently placed
into guardianship or adopted out of an out–of–home placement by the same guardianship
or adoptive family.
(b) (1) A foster care recipient or homeless youth is exempt from paying any
tuition at a public institution of higher education, regardless of that foster care recipient’s
or homeless youth’s receipt of any scholarship or grant if:
(i) The foster care recipient or homeless youth is enrolled at the
institution on or before the date that the foster care recipient or homeless youth reaches
the age of 25 years;
(ii) The foster care recipient or homeless youth is enrolled as a
candidate for a vocational certificate, an associate’s degree, or a bachelor’s degree; and
(iii) The foster care recipient or homeless youth has filed for federal
and State financial aid.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 2 –